Hawaii statutes.
§172-4 General default. If no person
appears and answers within the time allowed, the judge may at once upon motion
of the State order a general default to be recorded and the complaint for
foreclosure of the government's lien for commutation to be taken as confessed.
By the description in the notice "to all whom it may concern", all
the world is made party defendant and shall be concluded by the default and
order. [L 1909, c 90, §4; RL 1925, §573; RL 1935, §1604; RL 1945, §4634; RL
1955, §100-4; HRS §172-4]

Rules of Court

Default, see HRCP
rule 55(b).

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next